Wyoming, session 2026, HB0088.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 28-7-301 is created to read:

ARTICLE 3
PROHIBITING THE USE OF PUBLIC FUNDS FOR LOBBYING

28-7-301. Limitations on the use of state funds and
resources for lobbying by government entities.

HB0088

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0363
(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Governmental entity" means any unit of
state or local government or any branch, subdivision or
agency thereof or any school district or special district.
"Governmental entity" shall not include a for profit
organization that provides services as a part of an
authorized government contract;

(ii) "Lobby" or "lobbying" means to attempt to
influence legislation.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no
state funds or resources shall be expended be expended by
any governmental entity to do any of the following:

(i) Lobby the legislature;

(ii) Hire a person to lobby the legislature or
hire a person that is required to register as a lobbyist as
provided by W.S. 28-7-101;

HB0088

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0363
(iii) Pay dues or any other form of remuneration
to any association, entity or organization or any
affiliated associations, entities or organizations that
primarily represents governmental entities and that:

(A) Hires or contracts with person that is
required to register as a lobbyist as provided by W.S.
28-7-101 to lobby on behalf of the association, entity or
organization; or

(B) Lobbies the legislature.

(c) Each governmental entity shall, not later than
February 1 each year, submit a certification to the Wyoming
attorney general that the governmental entity was in
compliance with the requirements of this section for the
preceding calendar year. No state funds or resources shall
be provided to any governmental entity that fails to comply
with the provisions of this subsection.

(d) If a governmental entity violates subsection (b)
of this section, the attorney general or relevant district
attorney shall, on his own initiative or in response to a
HB0088

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0363
complaint, review the certification submitted under of
subsection (c) of this section, file for any necessary
injunctive relief and take any other enforcement action
authorized by law.

(e) Any taxpayer or resident of Wyoming shall have
standing to commence an action for appropriate injunctive
relief to prevent any activity prohibited by this act and
any further payments of public funds related to the
prohibited activity. A taxpayer or resident who prevails in
an action brought under this subsection is entitled to
recover court costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred
in bringing the action.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0088